

Duane Morris LLP - Victor F. Keen, Of Counsel - Profile



























































Skip to site navigation
Skip to main content
Skip to footer content
Skip to Site Search page
Skip to People Search page







Search the site




Search for a person



 No Results Found
                    











Connect with Duane Morris on LinkedIn
 Follow Duane Morris on Facebook
 Follow Duane Morris on Twitter
Follow Duane Morris LLP on Instagram 
Subscribe to Duane Morris RSS feeds  









 Toggle navigation    


 About Duane Morris 

About Duane Morris
 Firm Rankings & Statistics
 Past & Present
 Firm Accolades & Honors
 Attorney Accolades & Honors
Diversity & Inclusion
Women's Impact Network
Pro Bono
Affiliates
Careers
Alumni


Practices & Industries 

Practices & Industries
Expanded Service Area Listing


People
Offices
Events
News, Pubs & Multimedia 

Recent News & Publications
Alerts & Updates
Bylined Articles
In the News
Press Releases
For the Press
Video
Podcasts
Blogs






















Victor F. Keen
Of Counsel

  

Phone: +1 215 979 1945
Fax: +1 215 689 2732 
VFKeen@duanemorris.com




 



Duane Morris LLP30 South 17th StreetPhiladelphia, PA  19103-4196USA






Victor F. Keen
Of Counsel

  

Phone: +1 215 979 1945
Fax: +1 215 689 2732 
VFKeen@duanemorris.com




 



Duane Morris LLP30 South 17th StreetPhiladelphia, PA  19103-4196USA






Victor F. Keen
Of Counsel

Duane Morris LLP30 South 17th StreetPhiladelphia, PA  19103-4196USA


Phone: +1 215 979 1945
Fax: +1 215 689 2732 
VFKeen@duanemorris.com




 



 


 




Biography

Resume

Publications

Speaking Engagements




Victor F. Keen practices in the areas of partnership and corporate taxation and the tax aspects of workouts and bankruptcies.   Admitted to practice in Pennsylvania, New York, the District of Columbia and New Jersey, Mr. Keen is a member of the Real Estate and Partnership committees of the American Bar Association's Taxation Section and the Tax Law Section of the Pennsylvania Bar Association.     A former judicial clerk to the Honorable John W. Kern of the United States Tax Court, he is a 1966 graduate of Harvard Law School and a graduate of Trinity College.



Admissions

New York
District of Columbia
Pennsylvania
New Jersey

Education

Harvard Law School, J.D., 1966
	  		  	 		  

Experience

Duane Morris LLP  - Chair, Tax Department, 1999-2007 - Of Counsel, 2007-present  - Partner, 1995-2007
Cohen, Shapiro, Polisher, Shiekman and Cohen, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania  - Partner, Chair of Tax Department, 1993-1995
Kronish, Lieb, Weiner & Hellman, New York, New York  - Partner, 1983-1992
Whitman & Ransom, New York, New York  - Partner, 1976-1983
Milbank, Tweed, Hadley & McCloy, New York, New York  - Associate, 1968-1976
United States Tax Court, Washington, D.C., Judicial Clerk, Honorable John W. Kern, 1966-1968

Professional Activities

American Bar Association  - Taxation Section  -- Real Estate Committee  -- Chair, Subcommittee on Family Limited Partnerships  -- Partnership Committee
Pennsylvania Bar Association - Tax Law Section
Philadelphia Bar Association  - Tax Section

Board Memberships

3DIcon  - Co-Chairman, 2013-present  - Board Member, 2007-present

Honors and Awards

Listed in Best Lawyers Greater Philadelphia, 2016
Listed in Best Lawyers in America, 2007-2017
Listed in Pennsylvania Super Lawyers, 2004-2013
AV® Preeminent™ Peer Review Rated by Martindale-Hubbell

Civic and Charitable Activities

Vice President, Board's Executive Committee, Philadelphia Theatre Company
Member, Board of Directors, Spring Garden Civic Association




Selected Publications

"Taxpayer Relief Act of 1997:  Provisions Affecting Real Estate," Philadelphia Bar Association Tax Section Newsletter, November 1997
Principal draftsman, "Proposed Regulations Under Section 469(c)(7)," Report of the Philadelphia Bar Association Section on Taxation, May 1995.
"Real Estate Aspects of Revenue Reconciliation Act of 1993," Tri-State Real Estate Journal, September 17, 1993
"Choice of Securities in Corporate Acquisitions," Business Acquisitions, Practising Law Institute




Selected Speaking Engagements

"Tax Aspects of Equity-Based Compensation," Pennsylvania Bar Association CLE program, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, December 6, 2000 
"Tax Aspects of Equity-Based Compensation of a Service Partner," Philadelphia Bar Association, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, June 29, 1999 
Panelist, "Like-Kind Exchanges Under Internal Revenue Code Section 1031," San Diego, California, October 22 and 23, 1998 
Panelist, "Mergers and Acquisition Tax Planning," Philadelphia Tax Conference, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, October 6, 1998 
Panelist, "Tax Aspects of Environmental Remediation," Philadelphia Bar Association Environmental Law Committee, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, September 23, 1998 
"Planning Opportunities and Potential Pitfalls of Family Limited Partnerships," Montgomery County Estate Planning Council, Montgomery, Pennsylvania, November 24, 1997 
Course Planner, "Tax Relief Act of 1997," Continuing Legal Education program sponsored by the Pennsylvania Bar Institute and the Philadelphia Bar Association's Tax Section, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania November 20, 1997 
Panelist, "Financing Issues in Deferred Exchanges," and "Qualified Use Problems Under Section 1030," National Conference on Deferred Exchanges, Scottsdale, Arizona, October 30 and 31, 1997 
Panelist, "Section 1031 Deferred Exchanges:  Advanced Planning," 37th Annual Philadelphia Tax Seminar, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, October 28, 1997 
"Current Developments in Nonqualified Deferred Compensation:  Deferred Delivery Options and Transferable Options," Philadelphia Tax Supper Club, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, October 1, 1997 
Moderator and Panelist, "How to Make the Most Effective Use of Family Limited Partnerships," Co-sponsored by the Philadelphia Chapter of the Pennsylvania Institute of Certified Public Accountants (PICPA) and the Philadelphia Bar Association, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, June 25, 1997 
Panelist, "Choosing the Appropriate Business Entity--Alphabet Soup (C Corporation, S Corporation, LLP, LLC or LP?)," Co-sponsored by the Philadelphia Bar Institute and the Philadelphia Bar Education Center, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, June 19, 1997 
Course Planner and Moderator, "Estate Planning and S Corporations and Shareholders:  The 1996 Changes," Co-sponsored by the Probate and Trusts Section and the Tax Section of the Philadelphia Bar Education, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, March 4, 1997 
Chair, "The Tax Aspects of Environmental Remediation Expenses," mid-year meeting of the Taxation Section of the American Bar Association, Scottsdale, Arizona, January 1997 
Panelist, "Related Party Issues Under I.R.C. 1031 (e) and (f)", Like-Kind Exchanges Under 1031 I.R.C. conference sponsored by CoreStates Bank and Center for Professional Seminars, Las Vegas, Nevada, October 1996 
Moderator, "Choice of Entity," "Selling the Business" and "Business Succession Planning," Philadelphia Bar Education Center program, Lafayette Hill, Pennsylvania, September 1996 
Panel Chair, "Passive Activity Losses of Real Estate Professionals and Others," Philadelphia Bar Association Tax Luncheon Series, November 1995
Principal Draftsman, "Proposed Regulations Under Section 469(c)(7)," Report of the Philadelphia Bar Association Tax Section, May 1995
Panel Chair, "At-Risk:  Planning Opportunities," 1994 American Bar Association Tax Section Annual Meeting, New Orleans
Panelist, "Controversial Proposed Partnership Anti-Abuse Regulations," Philadelphia Bar Association Tax Luncheon Series, September 14, 1994
"Disguised Sales:  The New Section 707 Regulations," New York University Institute on Federal Taxation, New York City, November 11, 1992, San Francisco, December 9, 1992
"Fundamentals of Real Estate Taxation:  Troubled Real Estate," American Bar Association Annual Tax Section Meeting, August 11, 1992
"Working with S Corporations: Current Issues,"  New York State Bar Association, New York City, April 20, 1992
"Real Estate Workout Workshop," American Bar Association meeting, Washington, D.C., May 1991
"Sophisticated Tax Planning for Workouts, Foreclosures and Bankruptcies," 13th Annual New York University Conference on Federal Taxation of Real Estate Transactions, 1991

















×
Duane Morris LLP - Email Disclaimer


Contact Duane Morris Via E-mailThank you for your interest in Duane Morris.  
Please do not send confidential or sensitive information to us unless you speak with a Duane Morris attorney and receive specific authorization to 
send such information.  We cannot assure you that communications without such authorization will be considered or maintained confidential or privileged 
as to a matter in which Duane Morris does not already represent you.  
Please refer to the Disclaimer for further information.  
By clicking [ACCEPT TERMS] below to continue sending an e-mail, you acknowledge and agree to all the terms of this paragraph and the Disclaimer.

Accept Terms
Cancel






 











Victor F Keen - Philadelphia, PA - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



PA



Philadelphia



Legal Services



General Practice Attorney, Lawyer



                            Victor F Keen
                                    



 





















V 


Victor F Keen
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



30 S 17TH ST FL 9 PHILADELPHIA, PA 19103
Get Directions



(215) 979-1945





Business Info



 Founded 2010
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $120,000.00
 Employee Count 2
 Industries General Practice Attorney, Lawyer
 Contacts --







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Victor F Keen is located at 30 S 17th St Fl 9 in Philadelphia and has been in the business of General Practice Attorney, Lawyer since 2010. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







V

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.



















Victor F. Keen - Of Counsel at Duane Morris LLP



























































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology








            You have  
            
9 free profiles

              left this month   
			      

                Start Your Free Trial ➤
              








            Hey, we noticed you're a RelSci Pro subscriber! Would you like to view the page there?
            

                View on RelSci Pro ➤
              




























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink





Victor F. Keen
Of Counsel at Duane Morris LLP



Overview
In The News Relationships Paths
Education Memberships Career History Boards & Committees Political Donations Public Holdings Transactions Awards & Honors 


Victor F. Keen
Of Counsel at Duane Morris LLP



 Overview



Age



72
                                  (Born 1945)
                                              




Notable Companies


3DIcon Corp.




Awards



1





Board Seats



6





Number of Relationships



                This person is connected to 899 people.
              






 In The News
          See more




Marketwired
July 7, 2017





                        The Coretec Group Announces New Company Information; Shareholder Call                    





Marketwired
March 27, 2017





                        3DIcon Appoints Michael Kraft as CEO                    





Marketwired
June 1, 2016





                        3DIcon Corporation Announces Merger With Coretec Industries LLC                    





Marketwired
April 3, 2015





                        3DIcon Announces Personnel Changes                    





Philadelphia Inquirer
March 16, 2015





                        On the Boards                    







See full news coverage and complete stories with RelSci Professional.

Create Your News Feed








See  More 






 Relationships
              See Details




Robert L. Saxe

Founder at Research Frontiers, Inc.




Joseph M. Harary

Chief Executive Officer at Research Frontiers, Inc.





Doug Freitag

Director & Vice President-Technology at The Coretec Group, Inc.




Simon Calton

Founder at Coretec Industries LLC





Dennis Anderson

President & Chief Executive Officer at Coretec Industries LLC




Ron Dombrowski

Former Vice President-Sales & Marketing at CCW Energy Systems, Inc.





Seth L. Van Voorhees

Chief Financial Officer, Treasurer, Vice President-Business Development at Research Frontiers, Inc.




Anthony Martin Keating

Founder at 3DIcon Corp.





Anne Ewers

President & Chief Executive Officer at Kimmel Center for the Performing Arts




Priscilla M. Luce

Executive Managing Director at Philadelphia Theatre Company







See 889 more listings with RelSci Professional.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See 889 More 


 


 Paths to Victor F. Keen



            Victor F. Keen          




 You



 Connections via Relationship Science



 Victor F. Keen






Sync your contacts to see how you can connect with Victor F. Keen.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Educational Background



JD 
Class of 1966 


Harvard University - Harvard Law School

                  Harvard Law School offers an energetic and creative learning environment, a diverse and dedicated faculty—whose expertise spans a broad array of legal subjects—and a student body that comes from every state in the U.S. and more than 70 countries around the world.

Approximately 1,900 students attend HLS each year: 1,680 J.D. students, 160 LL.M. students, and 50 S.J.D. candidates. The faculty includes more than 100 full-time professors and more than 150 visiting professors, lecturers on law, and instructors. The curriculum features more than 260 courses and seminars that cover a broad range of traditional and emerging legal fields.

A Harvard Law education prepares students for success in law practice, business, public service, teaching, and more. Most HLS students are pursuing a J.D. (Juris Doctor) degree, while many others are earning an LL.M. (Master of Laws) or the S.J.D. (Doctor of Juridical Science). Harvard Law School also offers many joint degree programs, coordinated programs, and concurrent degree opportunities with other schools within Harvard University. The Law School community is also home to numerous research programs and engaging publications, including books, scholarly periodicals, newsletters, and a weekly student newspaper.                




Graduate 


Trinity College

                  Trinity College looks like a traditional New England liberal arts school.

But we act in some untraditional ways.

Our commitment to urban-global education, for example, is groundbreaking, as is our interdisciplinary Neuroscience Program and our First-Year Program, one of the earliest in the nation. We have also just added more than 20 young teacher/scholars to our faculty, and our faculty across the board is committed to collaboration with students on real-world research projects.

We continue to re-examine and transform the concept of liberal arts education because our graduates expect to thrive and to have a serious effect on the world.

Trinity’s 10:1 student/faculty ratio means access to teachers who have time to discuss your term paper in person, encourage your research project, and celebrate your success on Commencement Day. Choose from 38 academic majors in the liberal arts and sciences, including one in engineering, another program that is not traditional for a college like Trinity. Twenty-six interdisciplinary minors like human rights, Jewish studies, and African American studies give you even more choices.

World-wide study abroad, courses that include interaction with the city around us, and for-credit academic internships give you experience beyond the classroom.

And yes, our campus is beautiful in a traditional New England-college way—100 green acres dotted with historic buildings—and it’s located in an interesting place, Connecticut’s state capital, the city of Hartford. It’s home to 2,300 students from 45 states and 47 countries who connect to the College and each other through 100 student organizations, 29 NCAA Division III athletic teams, internships, and volunteer projects.

You can learn about all of this here on our Web site—academics, athletics, student activities, and more—but the best thing is to visit Trinity and see for yourself. Campus visits are conducted year-round, and you are always welcome                





 Memberships



Member

                  Current                


American Bar Association

                  American Bar Association provides legal services. It provides law school accreditation, continuing legal education, legal information and other services to assist legal professionals. The firm has members which include judges, court administrators, law professors, and non-practicing attorneys. The company was founded on August 21, 1878 and is headquartered in Chicago, IL.                




Member

                  Current                


Pennsylvania Bar Association

                  The Pennsylvania Bar Association is a voluntary bar association of lawyers and law students in Pennsylvania, United States. As of 2013, the Association had about 28,000 members and offers membership benefits including publications, practice support, networking, and continuing education                




Member

                  Current                


Philadelphia Bar Association

                  The Philadelphia Bar Association, founded in 1802, is the oldest association of lawyers in the United States. It is a keystone in the ongoing developments of the Philadelphia and Pennsylvania legal systems.

Attorneys, judges, and politicians alike look to the Philadelphia Bar Association for guidance on controversial legal issues; and for an organized meeting ground for professional support and information sharing.

Non-lawyers of the Philadelphia community count on, and look to, the Philadelphia Bar Association for general information on how to address their legal issues and where they can go to find additional information and help.

With more than 200 years of dedicated service to stand on, the Philadelphia Bar Association is firmly rooted in the Philadelphia community as a steady and reliable bellwether.                





 Career History



Of Counsel

                                    1995 - Current                


Duane Morris LLP


                  Duane Morris LLP provides legal services in the areas of intellectual property, telecommunications, information technologies, energy, water resources, endangered species and international dispute. The firm's clients include the automotive, construction, energy and insurance industries. The company was founded in 1904 and is headquartered in Philadelphia, PA.                




Chief Executive Officer

                                    2013 - Prior                


3DIcon Corp.


                  3DIcon Corp. develops 3D projection display technologies. Its product, CSpace, provides 360-degree viewable, high-resolution, color images, and is intended for use in government and industrial applications such as air traffic control, medical imaging, automotive and aerospace design, geological visualization, weather visualization, battle space visualization and cargo, baggage. The company sells a software product, Pixel Precision, a simple-to-use image creation, manipulation tool for engineers. 3DIcon was founded by Anthony Martin Keating on August 11, 1995 and is headquartered in Tulsa, OK.                




Head of the Compensation Committee

                                    2001 - Prior                


Research Frontiers, Inc.


                  Research Frontiers, Inc. engages in developing, licensing and commercializing suspended particle device (SPD) light-control technology for automobiles, homes, buildings, aircraft, boats, exhibition and display applications markets. It develops and licenses technologies to other companies that manufacture and market SPD-smart chemical emulsion or light-control film made from chemical emulsion, lamination services and electronics to power end-products incorporating the film, skylights and sunroofs. The company was founded by Robert L. Saxe in October 1965 and is headquartered in Woodbury, NY.                




Partner

                                    1993 - 1995                


Cohen Shapiro Polisher Shiekman & Cohen






Partner

                                    1983 - 1992                


Kronish, Lieb, Weiner, & Hellman LLP






Partner

                                    1976 - 1983                


Whitman & Ransom


                  Whitman & Ransom is a private company headquartered in the United States. The firm provides legal services.                




Associate

                                    1968 - 1976                


Milbank, Tweed, Hadley & McCloy LLP


                  Milbank, Tweed, Hadley & McCloy LLP is a global law firm that has provided legal solutions to many of the world’s corporate transactions and litigation. The firm’s transactional capabilities includes capital markets, corporate finance and transactions, project finance, acquisition finance, and other major fields of law practice. Milbank litigation teams resolve disputes involving mergers and acquisitions, proxy battles, financings and securities offerings, intellectual property, white-collar crime, and corporate restructurings, among others.                




Clerk

                                    1966 - 1968                


The United States Tax Court







 Boards & Committees



Corporate Boards ▾




Co-Chairman

                    Current                  


The Coretec Group, Inc.

                    The Coretec Group, Inc. engages in the development of technology-based solutions for application for the energy storage, solid state lighting, printable electronics, microelectronics, solar energy, and three dimensional (3D) imaging markets. Its product includes a 3D volumetric display under the CSpace brand. The company is headquartered in Tulsa, OK.                  




Secretary & Director

                    2001 - 2013                  


Research Frontiers, Inc.

                    Research Frontiers, Inc. engages in developing, licensing and commercializing suspended particle device (SPD) light-control technology for automobiles, homes, buildings, aircraft, boats, exhibition and display applications markets. It develops and licenses technologies to other companies that manufacture and market SPD-smart chemical emulsion or light-control film made from chemical emulsion, lamination services and electronics to power end-products incorporating the film, skylights and sunroofs. The company was founded by Robert L. Saxe in October 1965 and is headquartered in Woodbury, NY.                  




Member, Board of Directors

                    Prior                  


3DIcon Corp.

                    3DIcon Corp. develops 3D projection display technologies. Its product, CSpace, provides 360-degree viewable, high-resolution, color images, and is intended for use in government and industrial applications such as air traffic control, medical imaging, automotive and aerospace design, geological visualization, weather visualization, battle space visualization and cargo, baggage. The company sells a software product, Pixel Precision, a simple-to-use image creation, manipulation tool for engineers. 3DIcon was founded by Anthony Martin Keating on August 11, 1995 and is headquartered in Tulsa, OK.                  




Non-Profit Boards ▾




Vice President, Board of Directors

                    Current                  


Philadelphia Theatre Company

                    TO PRODUCE, DEVELOP, AND PRESENT ENTERTAINING AND IMAGINATIVE CONTEMPORARY THEATRE FOCUSED ON THE AMERICAN EXPERIENCE                  




Member, Board of Directors

                    Prior - 2016                  


Kimmel Center for the Performing Arts

                    The Kimmel Center for the Performing Arts is a large performing arts venue located at 300 South Broad Street at the corner of Spruce Street, along the stretch known as the "Avenue of the Arts", in Center City, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. It is owned and operated by Kimmel Center, Inc., an organization which also manages the Academy of Music in Philadelphia. The center is named after philanthropist Sidney Kimmel.

The Center is the home of the Philadelphia Orchestra, one of America's Big Five symphony orchestras and regarded as one of the best in the world. Kimmel Center is also the home venue of the Chamber Orchestra of Philadelphia, Philadanco, the Philadelphia Chamber Music Society, and a performance series known as Kimmel Center Presents, which hosts a variety of jazz, classical, and world pop performers.                  




Board Member

                    Prior                  


Spring Garden Civic Association







 Political Donations



$1,300

                  2008                


Robert James Lord


                  Board Member at Arizona Solar Energy Industries Association                




$1,300

                  2007                


Robert James Lord


                  Board Member at Arizona Solar Energy Industries Association                




$500

                  2005                


Carolyn Jane Maloney


                  Representative from New York's 12th Congressional District                




$500

                  1988                


Al Gore, Jr.


                  Former Vice President at Office of the Vice President Under Bill Clinton                





 Public Holdings






Restricted data only for RelSci Professional users.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Transactions



 Details Hidden



                  3DIcon Corp. raised money in a private placement transaction                                  





 Awards & Honors




                  Professional Certification                




New York State Bar







 Other Affiliations




              Victor F. Keen is affiliated with
                            Duane Morris LLP, 3DIcon Corp., Research Frontiers, Inc., Cohen Shapiro Polisher Shiekman & Cohen, Kronish, Lieb, Weiner, & Hellman LLP, Whitman & Ransom, Milbank, Tweed, Hadley & McCloy LLP, The United States Tax Court, The Coretec Group, Inc., Research Frontiers, Inc., 3DIcon Corp., Philadelphia Theatre Company, Kimmel Center for the Performing Arts, Spring Garden Civic Association.
            





You've reached your 10 free profiles limit this month.
Upgrade to RelSci Pro today to enjoy unlimited article views and much more!

Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.












Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤
























 


﻿











	Victor F. Keen - Kimmel Center










































×


Are you a new or returning patron?


New Account
            









Email cannot be blank.



Password cannot be blank.


Forgot your password?






First name cannot be blank.



Last name cannot be blank.



Email cannot be blank.
Please enter a valid email address.



Password cannot be blank.



Passwords do not match.



By registering, I agree to this website's Privacy Policy.





Create a new account





Enter Your Email Address:

















×


Join our email list
Stay up to date on all future events happening at Kimmel Center


First name cannot be blank.



Last name cannot be blank.



Email cannot be blank.
Please enter a valid email address.



Password cannot be blank.



Passwords do not match.



By creating an account, you agree to Kimmel Center Inc.'s Privacy Notice





Sign Up
















Join Email List







My Account






(0)Shopping Cart






Donate Now

















Home


Events & Tickets
                        







Menu






Home


Events and Tickets





Events


Events and Tickets

Find an Event

Wicked and Wild Sweepstakes

Calendar

Broadway Philadelphia Shows

Broadway Packages

Free Events at the Kimmel

Sittin' In: Live Sessions

Grow Up Great

NEW! Balcony Bar @ The Kimmel

PIFA 2018

Family Discovery Series

NEW! Wicked Pre-Theater Dining




Tickets


Ticket Information

NEW! 17/18 Broadway Season

Jazz Package 1718

Group Sales

Student Tickets

Community Rush

Gift Certificates

Subscriber Benefits

HAMILTON

Build Your Own Broadway Season







Plan Your Visit






Plan Your Visit
How to Find Us
Box Office
Accessibility 
Tours
Dining
Hotel Information
Seating Charts
Patron Safety Policy







Kimmel Center


Verizon Hall
Perelman Theater
Commonwealth Plaza
SEI Innovation Studio
Hamilton Garden







Merriam Theater




Academy of Music


Academy of Music Ballroom






Forrest Theatre






Education and Community


Education and Community
Business of Making Music
Creative Music Program for Jazz
Kimmel Center Jazz Camp of Philadelphia
Performing Arts Classes
ShowStoppers
Student Matinees
Community Partnerships & Initiatives
Broadway Dreams
Resident Company Education and Performance Programs
Jazz Residency Program
Teaching Artists
Teacher Appreciation




Support Us





Individual Support


Support Us

Membership

Academy Gold

Founders Circle

Matching Gifts

Member Events

Membership Forward

Donate Forward




More Ways To Support


Donate

Major Gifts

Planned Giving

Corporate Sponsorship







Rent Our Venues



Rent Our Venues 
Weddings
Special Events
Stages & Performances
Corporate Meetings
Film
Catering by Garces Events





About Us


About Us
Our Leadership
Careers & Volunteers
Blog
Press Room
Advertising Opportunities
Building the Center
Seating Charts
Resident Companies
Contact Us
Important Links
Fred J. Cooper Memorial Organ
NEA Letter





Join Email List








My Account






(0) Shopping Cart







Donate Now

















Home > About Us > Our Leadership > Victor F. Keen

Victor F. Keen







Victor has been a practicing attorney for over 40 years, the last decade of which was as the chair of the tax practice group at Duane Morris LLP.  He is currently “of counsel” at Duane Morris.
Since branching out from the full-time practice of law, Victor has become CEO of a company in the 3D-display field; co-founder of Bantam Pharmaceutical, a start-up company in the oncology space; and co-owner and co-manager of a portfolio of commercial rental real estate located in New York, New Jersey, Utah, and California.
In addition to his Kimmel Center board service, Victor contributes to the Philadelphia cultural community through, among other things, board memberships with The Philadelphia Theatre Company, The Philadelphia Film Society, and PlayPenn, Inc. (which nurtures new play development).  Victor is also a co-founder and board member of The Performance Garage (which provides rehearsal and performance space for emerging Philadelphia dance companies).
Victor’s other interests include assembling over many years an extensive collection of “outsider art” and vintage radios and toys, currently housed in a repurposed 19th century Philadelphia Quaker church now known as The Bethany Mission Gallery (bethanymissiongallery.org).
Victor left his hometown of Pueblo, Colorado in 1959 to attend Trinity College (Hartford, CN) and then Harvard Law School.
Victor is married to Jeanne Ruddy, former Martha Graham Dance Company Principal Dancer, former Juilliard Dance faculty member, founder of Jeanne Ruddy Dance Company (2000-2012), and co-founder with Victor of The Performance Garage.









TOUR THE KIMMEL CENTER








 




×













Need help with tickets?
Call: 215-893-1999
TTY: 215-875-7633
9am-8pm daily







Privacy Policy


Box Office & Ticket Policy


Press Room



Copyright 2001-2017, The Kimmel Center for the Performing Arts. All rights reserved.























 Keen Victor F Atty1900 Market St - Philadelphia PA - Reviews - Photos - Phone Number                        Are you a business?      Cancel       Search        1-800-561-3357    Claim this profile   Secure your company's official profile identity Claim profile   Scan your business   See how you appear everywhere online -- across top sites and against competitors Scan business   Try out BirdEye today   Take control of your business. Give it a try for free! Free trial         Edit Keen Victor F Atty   Attorneys Share 1900 Market St, Philadelphia, PA 19103       Is this your business? You can claim this profile as a part of the BirdEye suite. It will instantly provide you with a fully SEO optimized web presence solution and you will be able to update business information such as hours and categories, respond to reviews, share updates with followers, and so much more.   See a free demo Take BirdEye for a ride and see for yourself, instantly, how your business appears online using the Birdeye intelligence engine.              Business locations 1 location 2-9 locations 10-29 locations 30-199 locations 200+ locations Agency                           Thank you! Our reputation specialist will call you shortly to show you a personalized demo. Can't wait? Call us at 1-800-561-3357 ext. 1               (215) 665-4189   Write a review    ★ ★ ★ ★ ★               Submit  Your review will be shared publicly on the web. Privacy Policy - Terms of Service                        Thanks!Your review is on its way.  Thanks!Would you like to be contacted about this issue Yes No  Thanks!We will contact you as soon as possible!        Be the first to write a review    ★ ★ ★ ★ ★                 Submit                            Thanks! Your review is on its way. We will contact you as soon as possible!     Are you a business owner? See how your businessappears online.  Scan your business         Are you a business owner? claim this profile   or   See BirdEye in action.     See how you appear everywhere online -- across top sites and against competitors Scan business    Take control of your business. Give it a try for free! Free Trial          Contact Edit  1900 Market St, Philadelphia, PA 19103(215) 665-4189Not Specifiedvfkeen@duanemorris.comAttorneysClosed      Is this your business? You can claim this profile as a part of the BirdEye suite. It will instantly provide you with a fully SEO optimized web presence solution and you will be able to update business information such as hours and categories, respond to reviews, share updates with followers, and so much more.   See a free demo Take BirdEye for a ride and see for yourself, instantly, how your business appears online using the Birdeye intelligence engine.              Business locations 1 location 2-9 locations 10-29 locations 30-199 locations 200+ locations Agency                           Thank you! Our reputation specialist will call you shortly to show you a personalized demo. Can't wait? Call us at 1-800-561-3357 ext. 1           About Edit  Keen Victor F Atty is located at 30 S 17th St, Philadelphia, PA. This location is in the Center City West neighborhood. This business specializes in Law Firms.…more » Keen Victor F Atty is located at 30 S 17th St, Philadelphia, PA. This location is in the Center City West neighborhood. This business specializes in Law Firms.     Is this your business? You can claim this profile as a part of the BirdEye suite. It will instantly provide you with a fully SEO optimized web presence solution and you will be able to update business information such as hours and categories, respond to reviews, share updates with followers, and so much more.   See a free demo Take BirdEye for a ride and see for yourself, instantly, how your business appears online using the Birdeye intelligence engine.              Business locations 1 location 2-9 locations 10-29 locations 30-199 locations 200+ locations Agency                           Thank you! Our reputation specialist will call you shortly to show you a personalized demo. Can't wait? Call us at 1-800-561-3357 ext. 1            Things you should knowabout BirdEye    BirdEye was founded in 2012 to help businesses manage online reputation and customer experience BirdEye works with 15,000+ clients, from SMBs to large enterprises With BirdEye, you can monitor real-time customer feedback from 250+ sites and social channels Generate new authentic reviews with real-time automated feedback requests from BirdEye BirdEye gives you access to insights from your competitors’ customer feedback The BirdEye mobile app allows on-the-go customer experience management Use BirdEye’s free Scan Your Business tool for a snapshot of your online presence     
          Keen Victor F in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania with Reviews - YP.comStart your search by typing in the business name below.
What do you want to find?

Where?My current locationSearchHomePhiladelphia, PAKeen Victor FPhiladelphia, PA Keen Victor FAbout Search ResultsAbout Search ResultsYP - The Real Yellow PagesSM - helps you find the right local businesses to meet your specific needs. Search results are sorted by a combination of factors to give you a set of choices in response to your search criteria. These factors are similar to those you might use to determine which business to select from a local Yellow Pages directory, including proximity to where you are searching, expertise in the specific services or products you need, and comprehensive business information to help evaluate a business's suitability for you. “Preferred” listings, or those with featured website buttons, indicate YP advertisers who directly provide information about their businesses to help consumers make more informed buying decisions. YP advertisers receive higher placement in the default ordering of search results and may appear in sponsored listings on the top, side, or bottom of the search results page.Sort:DefaultDefaultDistanceRatingName (A - Z)Sponsored LinksAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your community collection!Error when adding to community collectionThis business was removed from the community collection1. Victor J. Saracini VA Outpatient Clinic (Montgomery County)433 Caredean DrHorsham, PA 19044(215) 823-6050Veterans & Military OrganizationsWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your home collection!Error when adding to home collectionThis business was removed from the home collection2. Victoria Keeney Cleaning & Moving Services620 Avenue FFeasterville Trevose, PA 19053(215) 605-9417House CleaningSponsored LinksShowing1-2
of 2resultsMap ViewSponsoredDidn't find what you were looking for?magnifying glass 
We just redesigned yp.com! Do you like it?×            LikeNot a Fan×            Thank You!Feedback











Victor F. Keen Lawyer Profile on Martindale.com















 

GROW YOUR PRACTICE ›






 
 

 


Back
Search Tools

Back
Attorneys/ Law Firms Search
Legal Library Search
Bar Associations Search


Ratings & Reviews

Back
Ratings & Reviews
Ratings & Reviews
For Attorneys
Overview
Peer Reviews
Client Reviews
For Consumers
Overview
Peer Reviews
Client Reviews


Attorney Products & Services

Back
Martindale-Nolo Legal Marketing Network
Legal Profiles
Law Directory in Print and on DVD
Websites
Lead Generation
Live Chat Service
Resources
The Bar Register of Preeminent Lawyers


ABOUT MARTINDALE-HUBBELL®

Back
About Martindale-Hubbell
Questions or Comments?















Search Tools

Attorneys/Law Firms Search
Legal Library Search
Bar Associations Search


Ratings & Reviews

Ratings & Reviews
For Attorneys
Overview
Peer Reviews
Client Reviews
For Consumers
Overview
Peer Reviews
Client Reviews


Attorney Products & Services

Martindale-Nolo Legal Marketing Network
Legal Profiles
Law Directory in Print and on DVD
Websites
Lead Generation
Live Chat Service
Resources
The Bar Register of Preeminent Lawyers


About Martindale-Hubbell®

About Martindale-Hubbell
Questions or Comments?












Home
Duane Morris LLP
Philadelphia
Pennsylvania
Attorney Profile














Victor F. Keen


<BACK TO FIRM OVERVIEW





















                                          Of Counsel
                                                                                      at
                                            Duane Morris LLP
                                                             (650 Attorneys)
                                        

30 South 17th Street, Philadelphia, PA 19103
View Victor F. Keen's
                                              office location
                                          








5.0/5.0


 


No Reviews
 









  Attorney Awards  





 




[ i ]
                            Profile Visibility
                          


About Profile Visibility
Profile Visibility is based on the total number of weekly profile views. It provides a weekly snapshot of
            which profiles users are viewing on martindale.com in the form of a ranking. We do not differentiate in
            the case of a tie, which may mean a number of attorneys in the same city display the same
            ranking. For example, if three lawyers each received 20 profiles views last week in Atlanta, and 20 is the
            highest number of profile views for that week, all three lawyers would receive a #1 ranking.

Close ×
 



#697 in weekly profile views out of 17,634 Attorneys in Philadelphia, PA
                            

#60,822 in weekly profile views out of 1,743,644 total attorneys Overall
                            


 









 



About Peer Rating
Martindale-Hubbell® Peer Review Ratings™ are the gold standard in attorney ratings, and have been for more than a century. These ratings indicate attorneys who are widely respected by their peers for their ethical standards and legal expertise in a specific area of practice.


The Martindale-Hubbell Peer Review Ratings process is the gold standard due to its objectivity and comprehensiveness. Lawyers solicited for peer reviews include both those selected by the attorney being reviewed and lawyers independently selected by Martindale-Hubbell. All reviewers are verified as attorneys through Martindale-Hubbell's extensive attorney database. Only attorneys practicing at least three years and receiving a sufficient number of reviews from non-affiliated attorneys are eligible to receive a Rating.
What are the different Martindale-Hubbell Peer Review Ratings?
AV Preeminent®: The highest peer rating standard. This rating signifies that a large number of the lawyer's peers rank him or her at the highest level of professional excellence for their legal knowledge, communication skills and ethical standards.
Distinguished: An excellent rating for a lawyer with some experience. This rating indicates the attorney is widely respected by their peers for high professional achievement and ethical standards.
Notable: This rating indicates that the lawyer has been recognized by a large number of their peers for strong ethical standards.
Lawyers who have received peer reviews after 2009 will display more detailed information, including practice areas, summary ratings, detailed numeric ratings and written feedback (if available). Details for individual reviews received before 2009 are not displayed.
Attorneys that receive reviews from their peers, but not a sufficient number to establish a Martindale-Hubbell Peer Review Rating, will have those reviews display on our websites.
For more information on Martindale-Hubbell Peer Review Ratings™, please visit our Ratings Page on Martindale.com and our Frequently Asked Questions
Close ×




About Client Rating
The Martindale-Hubbell® Client Review Ratings™ display reviews submitted by clients of lawyers and law firms.


The Client Review Rating score is determined through aggregation of validated responses. People who submit reviews are clients of law firms who hired a lawyer within the last year, whose matter is not pending and who want to share their experience of that lawyer or law firm with other potential clients. Reviewers can be anyone who hires a lawyer including in-house counsel, corporate executives, small business owners and private individuals.
Martindale-Hubbell validates that the reviewer is a person with a valid email address. As part of the review process, respondents must affirm that they have been a client of the lawyer or law firm identified within the past year, although Martindale-Hubbell cannot confirm the lawyer/client relationship as it is often confidential. The content of the responses are entirely from client reviewers.
Prior results do not guarantee a similar outcome and Martindale-Hubbell accepts no responsibility for the content or accuracy of any review.
For more information on Martindale-Hubbell Client Review Ratings, please visit our Client Review Page.
Close ×








Biography


Victor F. Keen practices in the areas of partnership and corporate taxation and the tax aspects of workouts and bankruptcies. Admitted to practice in Pennsylvania, New York, the District of Columbia and New Jersey, Mr. Keen is a member of the Real Estate and Partnership committees of the American Bar Association's Taxation Section and the Tax Law Section of the Pennsylvania Bar Association. A former judicial clerk to the Honorable John W. Kern of the United States Tax Court, he is a 1966 graduate of Harvard Law School and a graduate of Trinity College. Experience•Duane Morris LLP  - Chair, Tax Department, 1999-2007 - Of Counsel, 2007-present  - Partner, 1995-2007 •Cohen, Shapiro, Polisher, Shiekman and Cohen, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania  - Partner, Chair of Tax Department, 1993-1995 •Kronish, Lieb, Weiner & Hellman, New York, New York  - Partner, 1983-1992 •Whitman & Ransom, New York, New York  - Partner, 1976-1983 •Milbank, Tweed, Hadley & McCloy, New York, New York  - Associate, 1968-1976 •United States Tax Court, Washington, D.C., Judicial Clerk, Honorable John W. Kern, 1966-1968 Civic and Charitable Activities•Vice President, Board's Executive Committee, Philadelphia Theatre Company •Member, Board of Directors, Spring Garden Civic Association Honors and Awards•Listed in Best Lawyers Greater Philadelphia, 2016 •Listed in Best Lawyers in America, 2007-2017 •Listed in Pennsylvania Super Lawyers, 2004-2013 •AV Preeminent Peer Review Rated by Martindale-Hubbell Board Memberships•3DIcon  - Co-Chairman, 2013-present  - Board Member, 2007-present PublicationsSelected Publications• Taxpayer Relief Act of 1997: Provisions Affecting Real Estate, Philadelphia Bar Association Tax Section Newsletter, November 1997 •Principal draftsman, Proposed Regulations Under Section 469(c)(7), Report of the Philadelphia Bar Association Section on Taxation, May 1995. • Real Estate Aspects of Revenue Reconciliation Act of 1993, Tri-State Real Estate Journal, September 17, 1993 • Choice of Securities in Corporate Acquisitions, Business Acquisitions, Practising Law Institute Speaking EngagementsSelected Speaking Engagements• Tax Aspects of Equity-Based Compensation, Pennsylvania Bar Association CLE program, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, December 6, 2000 • Tax Aspects of Equity-Based Compensation of a Service Partner, Philadelphia Bar Association, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, June 29, 1999 •Panelist, Like-Kind Exchanges Under Internal Revenue Code Section 1031, San Diego, California, October 22 and 23, 1998 •Panelist, Mergers and Acquisition Tax Planning, Philadelphia Tax Conference, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, October 6, 1998 •Panelist, Tax Aspects of Environmental Remediation, Philadelphia Bar Association Environmental Law Committee, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, September 23, 1998 • Planning Opportunities and Potential Pitfalls of Family Limited Partnerships, Montgomery County Estate Planning Council, Montgomery, Pennsylvania, November 24, 1997 •Course Planner, Tax Relief Act of 1997, Continuing Legal Education program sponsored by the Pennsylvania Bar Institute and the Philadelphia Bar Association's Tax Section, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania November 20, 1997 •Panelist, Financing Issues in Deferred Exchanges, and Qualified Use Problems Under Section 1030, National Conference on Deferred Exchanges, Scottsdale, Arizona, October 30 and 31, 1997 •Panelist, Section 1031 Deferred Exchanges: Advanced Planning, 37th Annual Philadelphia Tax Seminar, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, October 28, 1997 • Current Developments in Nonqualified Deferred Compensation: Deferred Delivery Options and Transferable Options, Philadelphia Tax Supper Club, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, October 1, 1997 •Moderator and Panelist, How to Make the Most Effective Use of Family Limited Partnerships, Co-sponsored by the Philadelphia Chapter of the Pennsylvania Institute of Certified Public Accountants (PICPA) and the Philadelphia Bar Association, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, June 25, 1997 •Panelist, Choosing the Appropriate Business Entity--Alphabet Soup (C Corporation,'s Corporation, LLP, LLC or LP?), Co-sponsored by the Philadelphia Bar Institute and the Philadelphia Bar Education Center, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, June 19, 1997 •Course Planner and Moderator, Estate Planning and's Corporations and Shareholders: The 1996 Changes, Co-sponsored by the Probate and Trusts Section and the Tax Section of the Philadelphia Bar Education, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, March 4, 1997 •Chair, The Tax Aspects of Environmental Remediation Expenses, mid-year meeting of the Taxation Section of the American Bar Association, Scottsdale, Arizona, January 1997 •Panelist, Related Party Issues Under I.R.C. 1031 (e) and (f) , Like-Kind Exchanges Under 1031 I.R.C. conference sponsored by CoreStates Bank and Center for Professional Seminars, Las Vegas, Nevada, October 1996 •Moderator, Choice of Entity, Selling the Business and Business Succession Planning, Philadelphia Bar Education Center program, Lafayette Hill, Pennsylvania, September 1996 •Panel Chair, Passive Activity Losses of Real Estate Professionals and Others, Philadelphia Bar Association Tax Luncheon Series, November 1995 •Principal Draftsman, Proposed Regulations Under Section 469(c)(7), Report of the Philadelphia Bar Association Tax Section, May 1995 •Panel Chair, At-Risk: Planning Opportunities, 1994 American Bar Association Tax Section Annual Meeting, New Orleans •Panelist, Controversial Proposed Partnership Anti-Abuse Regulations, Philadelphia Bar Association Tax Luncheon Series, September 14, 1994 • Disguised Sales: The New Section 707 Regulations, New York University Institute on Federal Taxation, New York City, November 11, 1992, San Francisco, December 9, 1992 • Fundamentals of Real Estate Taxation: Troubled Real Estate, American Bar Association Annual Tax Section Meeting, August 11, 1992 • Working with's Corporations: Current Issues, New York State Bar Association, New York City, April 20, 1992 • Real Estate Workout Workshop, American Bar Association meeting, Washington, D.C., May 1991 • Sophisticated Tax Planning for Workouts, Foreclosures and Bankruptcies, 13th Annual New York University Conference on Federal Taxation of Real Estate Transactions, 1991
                







                            Areas of Practice (5)






Partnership Taxation
Corporate Taxation
Workouts Taxation
Bankruptcy Taxation
Affordable Housing










Education & Credentials


Contact Information:
215 979 1945  Phone215 689 2732  Faxwww.duanemorris.com/attorneys/victorfkeen.html


Law School Attended:
Harvard Law School, J.D., 1966


Year of First admission:
1967


Admission:
1967, District of Columbia; 1970, New York; 1994, Pennsylvania and New Jersey


Memberships:
Professional Activities•American Bar Association  - Taxation Section  -- Real Estate Committee  -- Chair, Subcommittee on Family Limited Partnerships  -- Partnership Committee •Pennsylvania Bar Association - Tax Law Section •Philadelphia Bar Association  - Tax Section


Birth Information:
Pueblo, Colorado, October 6, 1941


ISLN:
905977186



 




            Peer Reviews
            



About Peer Rating
Martindale-Hubbell® Peer Review Ratings™ are the gold standard in attorney ratings, and have been for more than a century. These ratings indicate attorneys who are widely respected by their peers for their ethical standards and legal expertise in a specific area of practice.


The Martindale-Hubbell Peer Review Ratings process is the gold standard due to its objectivity and comprehensiveness. Lawyers solicited for peer reviews include both those selected by the attorney being reviewed and lawyers independently selected by Martindale-Hubbell. All reviewers are verified as attorneys through Martindale-Hubbell's extensive attorney database. Only attorneys practicing at least three years and receiving a sufficient number of reviews from non-affiliated attorneys are eligible to receive a Rating.
What are the different Martindale-Hubbell Peer Review Ratings?
AV Preeminent®: The highest peer rating standard. This rating signifies that a large number of the lawyer's peers rank him or her at the highest level of professional excellence for their legal knowledge, communication skills and ethical standards.
Distinguished: An excellent rating for a lawyer with some experience. This rating indicates the attorney is widely respected by their peers for high professional achievement and ethical standards.
Notable: This rating indicates that the lawyer has been recognized by a large number of their peers for strong ethical standards.
Lawyers who have received peer reviews after 2009 will display more detailed information, including practice areas, summary ratings, detailed numeric ratings and written feedback (if available). Details for individual reviews received before 2009 are not displayed.
Attorneys that receive reviews from their peers, but not a sufficient number to establish a Martindale-Hubbell Peer Review Rating, will have those reviews display on our websites.
For more information on Martindale-Hubbell Peer Review Ratings™, please visit our Ratings Page on Martindale.com and our Frequently Asked Questions
Close ×

 











5.0/5.0












                                                            *Peer Reviews provided before April 15, 2008 are not displayed.
                                                    







 



Client Reviews 


About Client Rating
The Martindale-Hubbell® Client Review Ratings™ display reviews submitted by clients of lawyers and law firms.


The Client Review Rating score is determined through aggregation of validated responses. People who submit reviews are clients of law firms who hired a lawyer within the last year, whose matter is not pending and who want to share their experience of that lawyer or law firm with other potential clients. Reviewers can be anyone who hires a lawyer including in-house counsel, corporate executives, small business owners and private individuals.
Martindale-Hubbell validates that the reviewer is a person with a valid email address. As part of the review process, respondents must affirm that they have been a client of the lawyer or law firm identified within the past year, although Martindale-Hubbell cannot confirm the lawyer/client relationship as it is often confidential. The content of the responses are entirely from client reviewers.
Prior results do not guarantee a similar outcome and Martindale-Hubbell accepts no responsibility for the content or accuracy of any review.
For more information on Martindale-Hubbell Client Review Ratings, please visit our Client Review Page.
Close ×

 





                This attorney does not have client reviews.
            


Write a Review


Disclaimer


Disclaimer


No representation is made that the quality of legal services to be performed is greater than the quality of legal services performed by other lawyers. Testimonials or endorsements in any review do not constitute a guarantee, warranty, or prediction regarding the outcome of your legal matter. Past results are not a guarantee of any future results as each case must be decided on its own merits. Client Review Ratings and/or Peer Review Ratings may not be available for all firms and/or lawyers and the fact that a firm or lawyer has not been reviewed should not be construed as unfavorable.
Close ×

 













Documents ({{amountArticles}})


Documents by this lawyer on Martindale.com













{{ entry.article_type_desc.toUpperCase()  }}




                                        {{getPublishDateFormatted(entry.publish_date) | date:'MMMM d, yyyy'}},
                                        previously published on
                                        {{getPublishDateFormatted(entry.previous_publish_date) | date:'MMMM d, yyyy'}}
                                    
 | Author:
                                        

                                                ,
                                            

                                                ,
                                            





Law Firm:
                                    






 







                    Other documents:
                    
, 





SHOW MORE DOCUMENTS




SHOW ALL DOCUMENTS






 



            Philadelphia, Pennsylvania
                    

















Philadelphia, PA


                                                                                          30 South 17th Street
                                          

Philadelphia, PA 19103


215 979 1945 Phone


Get Directions





















Contact Victor F. Keen



Please correct the fields highlighted in red.

































Choose Area of Practice
{{aop.aopName}}
Other




Preferred Contact Method
Email
Phone




Are you an Attorney?
Yes, I am an Attorney
No












{{ (description ? description.length : 0) + ' out of 1000 characters' }}










SUBMIT

Clear All




By clicking on the "Submit" button, you agree to the Terms of Use,
Supplemental Terms and
                        Privacy Policy. You also consent to be contacted at the phone number you provided, including by autodials, text messages and/or pre-recorded calls, from Martindale and its affiliates and from or on behalf of attorneys you request or contact through this site. Consent is not a condition of purchase.



You should not send any sensitive or confidential information through this site. Emails sent through this site do not create an attorney-client relationship and may not be treated as privileged or confidential. The lawyer or law firm you are contacting is not required to, and may choose not to, accept you as a client. The Internet is not necessarily secure and emails sent though this site could be intercepted or read by third parties.







Close 



PRINT
BACK TO PREVIOUS SCREEN




Thank you

All information received will always remain confidential. You will be contacted once your message has been reviewed. Please see summary of your contact submission below. A copy of your submission has been sent to the email address provided.





Name:
{{firstName}} {{lastName}}


Email:
{{email}}


Phone:
{{phone}}


Country:
{{country.country_name}}


Zip Code:
{{zipCode}}


City:
{{city}}


State:
{{state}}


Area of practice:
{{aopDropdown.name}}


Preferred method of contact:
{{contactMethod}}


Are you an Attorney?
{{attorneyCheck}}


Law Firm/ Company Name
{{lawFirm}}


Describe legal matter:
{{description}}



PRINT
BACK TO PREVIOUS SCREEN








































{{text}}






{{text}}


CHANGE LOCATION ›








{{category}}






{{category}}


See All {{count}} ›








{{category}}
{{text}}








































Insider Trading - Keen Victor F - Form 4 SEC Filings












Home |
Archives |
Products |
About |
Contact |
FAQ |



New User?
Sign Up | 
Sign In









Form 4 Filings


Insider Buys


Significant Buys


Penny StocksInsider Buying


Insider Sales




Insider Buy Sell Ratios


Stock Options


Insider TradingStock Screener


Insider TradingGraph View


Insider Watch





Sec Filings Insider Trading - Keen Victor F





Select Time period: 
1 Month
2 Months
3 Months
6 Months
1 Year
2 Years
3 Years
4 Years
All Data
 

     



google

   



yahoo!



Send this page to:  

Blog
  



Digg

  



Reddit

  



Facebook

  



Stumble

  



del.icio.us








Enter Stock Ticker Symbol or Cik:




Cik Lookup...






Search By Company or Insider Name:







"Insiders might sell their shares for any number of reasons, but they buy them for only one:
they think the price will rise"
- Peter Lynch ==>>

What is insider trading>>



Email a friend >>...







Historical filings delayed by 6 months. New user?
Sign Up for real time data.
Existing user?
Sign In

Stock options: Exercise, Award, Grant, Conversion



TransactionDate
ReportedDate
ExercisableExpiration
Company
Symnbol
InsiderRelationship
SharesTraded
ConversionPrice
SharesOwned
Filing




2016-09-30Option Award
2016-10-055:28 pm
2016-09-30N/A
3dicon Corp
TDCP
Keen Victor FChief Executive OfficerDirector10% Owner
111,880
$0
1,457,848(Direct)
View


2016-09-30Option Award
2016-10-055:28 pm
2016-09-30N/A
3dicon Corp
TDCP
Keen Victor FChief Executive OfficerDirector10% Owner
152,386
$0
1,457,848(Direct)
View


2016-03-24Option Award
2016-03-283:07 pm
2016-03-24N/A
3dicon Corp
TDCP
Keen Victor FChief Executive OfficerDirector10% Owner
1,193,582
$0
1,193,582(Direct)
View









    © 2005-2017 SecForm4.Com All rights reserved.
    Archives:
    2017 2016 2015 2014 2013 2012 ... 
    Sat, 22 Jul 2017 11:12:20 -0500
  

    SEC is the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. EDGAR is a trademark of the SEC.
    SecForm4.Com is not affiliated with or approved by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC).
Terms of Use |
    Privacy Statement |
  








 


Board of Directors :: The Coretec Group Inc. (TDCPD)
















 























        	About        










Board of Directors









 






Victor Keen
Director, Co-Chairman



Mr. Keen is a significant shareholder in 3DIcon, has been a member of the Board since November 2007 and served as CEO from 2013 to 2016. Mr. Keen is a graduate of Harvard Law School and Trinity College. He is currently of-counsel at Duane Morris LLP, an international law firm with over 20 offices worldwide, where until 2011 he was the Chair of its Tax Practice Group. Mr. Keen has been an active investor in a number of private companies, both start up and later stage, including: Lending Tree; Circle Lending, Inc., now part of Richard Branson's Virgin Group; Bantam Pharmaceutical LLC, a biotechnology company, co-founded in 2015 by Mr. Keen, focusing on the discovery and development of innovative cancer therapies; and Retirement Clearinghouse LLC, a company involved in the matching of individual IRA/pension accounts with appropriate managers. In addition, he is an investor and former board member in publicly-traded Research Frontiers, Inc., inventor and licensor of "smart glass" technology. Mr. Keen also owns and co-managers a four-state commercial real estate portfolio. 




Simon Calton
Director, Co-Chairman



Simon Calton has a wealth experience in financing and company structuring. Since 2008 Mr. Calton has structured a number of regulated and Alternative Investment Products in the British Virgin Islands, Cayman Islands, United States and the United Kingdom. In 2012 he co-founded Carlton James Ltd, which specializes in funding specific projects and developments across the globe. In 2007 Mr. Calton co-founded Carlton James Private and Commercial, a project investment, pension administration service and global financing firm which helps to fund projects around the globe. In addition Mr. Calton sits on the board of a number of different companies across a range of industries including technology, hedge funds, wealth management companies and consultancy firms. Whilst also writing for publication globally including OPP, Bloomberg, Forbes and WealthManagement.com. 




Doug Freitag
Vice President of Technology, Director



Doug Freitag brings decades of experience to his new role, including more than 30 years of commercializing advanced materials in aerospace, electronics, photonics, medical, and building industries and more than 25 years of federal grant and contract funding expertise. He has served in various engineering and management positions while employed by Ford Motor Company, Honeywell, and Lockheed Martin and supports a number of organizations, including Cerus, DNA Electronics, and Grey Innovations, among others. Support provided included research, development and transition of new technologies and Federal Business development. In 2016 alone, he has contributed to winning new Federal contracts for clients with a value of over $230 million. Mr. Freitag was hired by 3DIcon as a Federal business development expert in December of 2013 and has served as the CEO of the The Coretec Group until recently. He has a BSME and MSME from Purdue University. 




Dennis Anderson
Director



Mr. Anderson is an entrepreneur with over 23 years of experience in creating, funding, and/or managing technology-based startups and emerging companies primarily focused on research, development, and commercialization of new biotechnology and biopharmaceutical products for human and veterinary markets. He served as a co-founder and President of Coretec Industries LLC since 2015. Prior to co-founding Coretec, Mr. Anderson served as an Associate Vice President in the Office of Research and Creative Activities at North Dakota State University. Mr. Anderson graduated with a B.Sc. (microbiology) from North Dakota State University and M.Sc. (virology) from Kansas State University. 




Ron Dombrowski
Director



Ron Dombrowski has served as a member of Coretec's Board of Directors since August 2015. From 2010 to 2015, he served as Vice President of Sales and Marketing for CCW Energy Systems and Director of Sales for its parent company Lifting Solutions. Mr. Dombrowski has over 25 years of global sales and operations experience, growing and scaling both startups and Fortune 500 technology companies. He is a graduate of the Southern Illinois University with degrees in Electrical Engineering and Management. 



















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft














Keen All - FREE Shipping & Exchanges











































































































Email
service@shoes.com








Call
1 (888) 200 - 8414

                                        Mon - Fri: 8:00 AM - Midnight ET
                                        
                                        Sat - Sun: 8:00 AM - 11:00 PM ET
                                    





























Error



Close
















Advanced Search





















Wish
List




0
Cart












														Your cart is currently unavailable
													








Checkout





















								Advanced search is currently unavailable
							

Close  ✕













































0



































Home > All Brands > Keen Shoes > Keen All




You narrowed by


Keen





Narrow by
Product


Shoes (171)

Clothing (1)





Narrow by
Category


Boots (125)

Classics (54)

Closed Toe (67)

Comfort (142)

Active Sandals (22)

Athletic Shoes (47)

Casual Shoes (78)

Fisherman Sandals (17)

Sandals (38)

Trail Shoes (32)



Boots (125)

Classics (54)

Closed Toe (67)

Clothing (2)

Comfort (142)

Diabetic (5)

Leather (143)

Open Toe (1)

Slippers (1)

Sneakers (58)

Snow Activities (90)

Steel Toe (1)

Swimwear (9)

Walking (46)

Active Sandals (22)

Adjustable Strap Sandals (2)

Adjustable Strap Shoes (20)

Adjustable Width Shoes (1)

Amphibious Sandals (15)

Amphibious Shoes (9)

Ankle Strap Sandals (1)

Athletic (20)

Athletic Shoes (47)

Beach Sandals (1)

Beach Shoes (3)

BLVD Collection (7)

Bungee Lace Shoes (16)

Cage Shoes (1)

Casual (46)

Casual Keen Collection (45)

Casual Shoes (78)

Clearance Deals (2)

Clogs (2)

Closed Back Clogs (2)

Crib Shoes (2)

Fisherman Sandals (17)

Fitness Shoes (2)

Flat Clogs (2)

Flat Sandals (1)

Garden Clogs (2)

Gym Shoes (4)

High Tops (7)

Hiking Sandals (2)

Hiking Shoes (41)

Howser Collection (4)

Huaraches (6)

Indoor/Outdoor Clogs (2)

Lace Up Shoes (43)

Loafers (1)

Mary Janes (4)

Moc Toe Shoes (1)

Newport H2 (5)

Nubuck Shoes (5)

Oxfords (1)

Playground Shoes (2)

Quarter Strap Sandals (1)

Rose Collection (1)

Rounded Toe Shoes (12)

Safety Shoes (1)

Sandals (38)

School Shoes (2)

Shearling Clogs (2)

Sienna Collection (1)

Slides (1)

Slingbacks (1)

Slip Resistant Shoes (4)

Slip-on Shoes (8)

Sport Sandals (7)

Strappy Sandals (6)

Swedish Clogs (2)

Targhee Collection (5)

Terradora Collection (3)

Trail Shoes (32)

UNEEK Collection (11)

Venice (2)

Voyageur (4)

Water Shoes (13)

Waterproof Shoes (25)

Whisper (1)

Wooden Clogs (2)

Wool Clogs (2)

Work Shoes (1)

Woven Sandals (1)

Woven Shoes (3)


 See Full List



Narrow by
Age/Gender


Any Age/Gender

									Women

									Men

									Girls

									Boys

									Infants




Narrow by
Color





























































































Narrow by
Price


Under $35 (13)

$35 - $65 (70)

$65 - $100 (72)

$100 - $150 (65)

$150 - $300 (11)

On Sale (94)





Narrow by
Feature


Beach (12)

Cushioned (42)

Hiking (52)

Lace Up (77)

Lug Sole (53)

Non-Marking Sole (73)

Outdoor (144)

Polyester (16)

Rubber Sole (122)

Synthetic (53)



ASTM (2)

Adjustable Strap (24)

All Terrain (3)

Ankle Strap (1)

Arch Support (4)

Beach (12)

Big Kid (42)

Braided (3)

Breathable (74)

Buckle Fastening (1)

Buckles (2)

Caged (2)

Canvas (5)

Closed Toe (4)

Compression (4)

Contrast Stitching (3)

Cuban Heel (2)

Cushioned (42)

Easy Closure (1)

Exercise (4)

Fashion (1)

Fleece (3)

Fleece Lined (3)

Flexible (9)

Foot Odor (71)

Full Grain Leather (11)

Fur (4)

Furry (4)

Handmade (1)

Hiking (52)

Hook and Loop (22)

Inside Zipper (1)

Insulated (18)

Lace Up (77)

Latex (1)

Lightweight (45)

Lined (41)

Little Kids (11)

Lug Sole (53)

Mesh (41)

Microfiber (5)

Mid Calf (8)

Moisture Wicking (1)

Non-Marking Sole (73)

Nubuck (17)

Nylon (14)

Outdoor (144)

Padded (17)

Polyester (16)

Polyurethane (2)

Preschool (1)

Quick Dry (5)

Quilted (2)

Removable Footbed (49)

Rubber (2)

Rubber Sole (122)

Safety (1)

Safety Toe (1)

Slip-on (9)

Steel Toe (1)

Style Trek (11)

Suede (4)

Synthetic (53)

TPU (6)

Textile (7)

Travel (4)

Trend (1)

Two Tone (1)

Vegan (1)

Walking (1)

Washable (7)

Water Resistant (3)

Waterproof (61)

Winter (13)

Woven (8)

Zip Up (1)

Zipper (1)


 See Full List






Related Searches

womens keen sandals newport


womens newport h2 sandals


mens keen blue sandals


keen sandals


womens keen sandals


womens keen clearwater cnx





  






There's a new kid on the trail, KEEN, who made a lot of friends by offering quality outdoor shoes, hiking boots, sandals, and more. Men, women,... Keen



Keen All
 



 1-36 of 172 results
  1 2 3 4 5 Next
Sort by

Popularity
New
Brand A-Z
Brand Z-A
Price Low-High
Price High-Low
Avg. Customer Rating
Percent Off


Display 

12 per page
24 per page
36 per page
48 per page
96 per page

 



 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale











































Keen Newport H2 Sandal (Men's)
  8 colors available 
 $69.95 - $99.95
 $100.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







New





Sale





Sale





Sale

































Keen Whisper Sandal (Women's)
  9 colors available 
 $62.95 - $89.95
 $90.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 






















Keen Targhee II Mid Hiking Boot (Men's)
  3 colors available 
 $134.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 






















Keen Rose Sandal (Women's)
  3 colors available 
 $89.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Sale





Sale





Sale














































Keen Newport H2 Sandal (Children's)
  11 colors available 
 $34.95 - $49.95
 $50.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 

















Keen Newport (Men's)
  2 colors available 
 $109.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Keen Arroyo II (Men's)
  1 color available 
 $69.95
 $100.00 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Sale

































Keen Newport H2 Sandal (Women's)
  7 colors available 
 $69.95 - $99.95
 $100.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 



























Keen Targhee II (Men's)
  4 colors available 
 $124.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale

























Keen UNEEK Sandal (Men's)
  5 colors available 
 $69.95 - $99.95
 $100.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 



























Keen UNEEK Sandal (Women's)
  4 colors available 
 $99.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 












Keen Voyageur Hiking Shoe (Men's)
  1 color available 
 $114.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Sale










Keen Clearwater CNX (Men's)
  3 colors available 
 $69.95 - $99.95
 $100.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 

















Keen Presidio (Women's)
  2 colors available 
 $109.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 

















Keen Rialto H2 Fisherman Sandal (Men's)
  2 colors available 
 $119.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale










Keen Uneek 8mm Cord Sandal (Men's)
  2 colors available 
 $69.95 - $99.95
 $100.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 






















Keen Voyageur Hiking Shoe (Women's)
  3 colors available 
 $114.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Keen Uneek Braided Slingback (Men's)
  1 color available 
 $69.95
 $100.00 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Sale










Keen UNEEK Slide Sandal (Men's)
  3 colors available 
 $62.95 - $89.95
 $90.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 

















Keen Rialto Fisherman Sandal (Men's)
  2 colors available 
 $129.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Sale





Keen UNEEK O2 Sandal (Men's)
  2 colors available 
 $62.95
 $90.00 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Sale





Sale

































Keen Seacamp II CNX (Children's)
  8 colors available 
 $38.95 - $54.95
 $55.00 up to 29% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 

















Keen Rialto 3 Point Adjustable Strap Sandal (Men's)
  2 colors available 
 $119.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Sale





Sale





Sale





Sale





Keen Clearwater CNX (Women's)
  5 colors available 
 $69.95 - $75.95
 $100.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 

















Keen Oakridge Hiking Shoe (Men's)
  2 colors available 
 $94.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Sale





Sale





Sale





Sale








Sale





Keen UNEEK O2 Sandal (Women's)
  6 colors available 
 $62.95
 $90.00 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 

















Keen Oakridge Waterproof Hiking Shoe (Men's)
  2 colors available 
 $114.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Keen Saltzman Waterproof Hiking Shoe (Men's)
  1 color available 
 $99.95
 $130.00 23% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







New















Keen Austin Shoe (Men's)
  3 colors available 
 $109.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale










Keen Uneek Stripes Woven Sandal (Men's)
  2 colors available 
 $74.95 - $99.95
 $100.00 up to 25% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale















Keen Gypsum II Mid Waterproof Hiking Boot (Men's)
  3 colors available 
 $104.95 - $149.95
 $150.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Sale





Sale





Sale

































Keen Newport H2 Sandal (Infants/Toddlers')
  9 colors available 
 $34.95 - $49.95
 $50.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 

















Keen Oakridge Hiking Shoe (Women's)
  2 colors available 
 $94.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







New





New










New























New





Keen Terradora Mid Waterproof Hiking Boot (Women's)
  8 colors available 
 $139.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 












Keen Voyageur Mid (Men's)
  1 color available 
 $124.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 












Keen Braddock Mid Steel Toe Boot (Men's)
  1 color available 
 $184.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

  Next Page  




 


  
 Quick View is not available. Please try again. 
     
























Back to School - FREE Shipping & Exchanges



































































































Email
service@shoes.com








Call
1 (888) 200 - 8414

                                        Mon - Fri: 8:00 AM - Midnight ET
                                        
                                        Sat - Sun: 8:00 AM - 11:00 PM ET
                                    





























Error



Close
















Advanced Search





















Wish
List




0
Cart












														Your cart is currently unavailable
													








Checkout





















								Advanced search is currently unavailable
							

Close  ✕













































0



































BACK TO SCHOOL
The Best Brands & Styles to Kick Off the Year







GIRLS' SHOES

Athletic/Running
Sneakers
Slip-Ons
Flats
Boots
Sandals



BOYS' SHOES

Athletic Shoes
Sneakers
Slip-Ons
Boots
Sandals



Shop by Size

Little Kid
Big Kid
Women
Men



top brands

Skechers
Converse
Adidas
Toms
Heelys




Uniform shoes
Kids
Sale











Get Everything on Their List
Shop All




Girls

Athletic/Running
Sneakers
Slip-Ons
Flats
Boots
Sandals

boys

Athletic Shoes
Sneakers
Slip-Ons
Boots
Sandals

shop by size

Little Kid
Big Kid
Women
Men





Most Popular Must-Haves




Converse All Star Sneakers 




 
TOMS Alpargata 




 
Dr. Martens 1460 Boots 





adidas Cloudfoam Sneakers 




 
Timberland Wheat Boots 





Vans Old Skool Sneakers 
















Statement Makers
Eye-Catching Sneakers They'll Love







Shop Classic White 



Shop Platform 



Shop Court 






SHOP GIRLS' SNEAKERS


SHOP BOYS' SNEAKERS










Top Of The Class
Styles Everyone's Talking About







Shop Knits 



Shop Metallics 



Shop Details 





SHOP GIRLS' TREND


SHOP BOYS' TREND










Complete Their Look
Head-to-Toe Essentials







Shop Running 



Shop Backpacks  



Shop Hoodies 






SHOP ALL GIRLS


shop all boys














brand spotlight


































At shoes.com, we offer more than just the world's best kids' shoes deals for going back to school - we offer a great selection of girls' shoes and boys' shoes from top brands online so you can shop at your convenience. Anytime, anywhere. In our amazing curated shop, you'll find great deals on all the essential school shoes perfect for welcoming the new school year.
Our shop has something for every kid in every grade. Beyond footwear, we have a great selection of clothing, bags, and all kinds of accessories for the start of a fresh school year. We offer girls' and boys' shoes, clothing, and accessories from the best brands, with thousands of top styles and products in stock. There's always a giant selection of girls' school shoes and boys' school shoes on sale, with the lowest prices on kids' boots, kids' sneakers, kids' sandals & everything they need for going back to class.
Check back periodically to see what new styles we're offering at the best prices as we get closer to the first day back. Always check for coupons that offer even more savings.
Shoes.com is committed to helping you find the kids' footwear and fashion you love at a price that's guaranteed to make you smile, all before the first bell rings.

























Best Deals - shoes.com - FREE Shipping & Exchanges





























































































Email
service@shoes.com








Call
1 (888) 200 - 8414

                                        Mon - Fri: 8:00 AM - Midnight ET
                                        
                                        Sat - Sun: 8:00 AM - 11:00 PM ET
                                    





























Error



Close
















Advanced Search





















Wish
List




0
Cart












														Your cart is currently unavailable
													








Checkout





















								Advanced search is currently unavailable
							

Close  ✕













































0



































Home > Best Deals
































































To make your shopping a little easier, we've put all our best deals on shoes, clothing, and more all in one place. From Black Friday to Cyber Monday, we have all the biggest sales throughout the year, with savings on just about everything. Shop our Fourth of July Deals, Presidents Day Deals, Black Friday Deals, Cyber Monday Deals, and other holiday deals on top styles from the best brands. Whether you're looking for the perfect gift or stocking up for yourself, there's a sale or deal to match your every need. Check back in each week to see the latest updates so you don't miss out on saving. Happy shopping!





















Womens Keen Footwear: Up to 55% Off | Womens Keen Loafers & Slippers: FREE Shipping











































































































Email
service@shoes.com








Call
1 (888) 200 - 8414

                                        Mon - Fri: 8:00 AM - Midnight ET
                                        
                                        Sat - Sun: 8:00 AM - 11:00 PM ET
                                    





























Error



Close
















Advanced Search





















Wish
List




0
Cart












														Your cart is currently unavailable
													








Checkout





















								Advanced search is currently unavailable
							

Close  ✕













































0



































Home > Womens Shoes > Keen Womens




You narrowed by


Keen


Women


Undo All Selections





Narrow by
Product


Shoes (59)

Clothing (1)





Narrow by
Category


Closed Toe (34)

Comfort (65)

Active Sandals (7)

Amphibious Sandals (6)

Amphibious Shoes (6)

Athletic Shoes (13)

Casual Shoes (26)

Sandals (12)

Trail Shoes (15)

Water Shoes (6)



Boots (58)

Classics (30)

Closed Toe (34)

Clothing (2)

Comfort (65)

Diabetic (5)

Leather (42)

Sneakers (16)

Snow Activities (33)

Walking (22)

Active Sandals (7)

Adjustable Strap Shoes (4)

Adjustable Width Shoes (1)

Amphibious Sandals (6)

Amphibious Shoes (6)

Ankle Strap Sandals (1)

Athletic (5)

Athletic Shoes (13)

Beach Shoes (1)

BLVD Collection (5)

Bungee Lace Shoes (7)

Cage Shoes (1)

Casual (14)

Casual Keen Collection (12)

Casual Shoes (26)

Clearance Deals (1)

Clogs (2)

Closed Back Clogs (2)

Fisherman Sandals (7)

Fitness Shoes (1)

Flat Clogs (2)

Garden Clogs (2)

Gym Shoes (2)

High Tops (1)

Hiking Shoes (14)

Howser Collection (2)

Huaraches (3)

Indoor/Outdoor Clogs (2)

Lace Up Shoes (11)

Loafers (1)

Mary Janes (2)

Newport H2 (1)

Nubuck Shoes (1)

Oxfords (1)

Quarter Strap Sandals (1)

Rose Collection (1)

Rounded Toe Shoes (8)

Safety Shoes (1)

Sandals (12)

Shearling Clogs (2)

Sienna Collection (1)

Slingbacks (1)

Slip Resistant Shoes (1)

Slip-on Shoes (4)

Sport Sandals (1)

Strappy Sandals (4)

Swedish Clogs (2)

Targhee Collection (2)

Terradora Collection (3)

Trail Shoes (15)

UNEEK Collection (4)

Venice (2)

Voyageur (2)

Water Shoes (6)

Waterproof Shoes (8)

Whisper (1)

Wooden Clogs (2)

Wool Clogs (2)

Work Shoes (1)

Woven Sandals (1)

Woven Shoes (1)


 See Full List



Narrow by
Color





































































Narrow by
Price


Under $35 (1)

$35 - $65 (4)

$65 - $100 (31)

$100 - $150 (35)

$150 - $300 (6)

On Sale (31)





Narrow by
Feature


Beach (4)

Cushioned (14)

Hiking (22)

Lace Up (27)

Lug Sole (19)

Mesh (16)

Non-Marking Sole (20)

Outdoor (49)

Polyester (4)

Rubber Sole (38)



ASTM (1)

All Terrain (3)

Ankle Strap (1)

Arch Support (3)

Beach (4)

Breathable (20)

Buckles (2)

Caged (1)

Canvas (1)

Closed Toe (1)

Compression (2)

Contrast Stitching (1)

Cuban Heel (2)

Cushioned (14)

Exercise (2)

Fleece Lined (1)

Flexible (5)

Foot Odor (20)

Full Grain Leather (7)

Fur (3)

Furry (1)

Hiking (22)

Inside Zipper (1)

Insulated (7)

Lace Up (27)

Lightweight (16)

Lined (11)

Lug Sole (19)

Mesh (16)

Microfiber (1)

Mid Calf (4)

Moisture Wicking (1)

Non-Marking Sole (20)

Nubuck (8)

Nylon (3)

Outdoor (49)

Polyester (4)

Polyurethane (2)

Quilted (2)

Removable Footbed (20)

Rubber (1)

Rubber Sole (38)

Safety (1)

Slip-on (5)

Style Trek (9)

Suede (1)

Synthetic (13)

TPU (3)

Textile (4)

Travel (1)

Two Tone (1)

Vegan (1)

Walking (1)

Washable (3)

Waterproof (21)

Winter (6)

Woven (3)

Zipper (1)


 See Full List






Related Searches

womens shoes strappy sandals


womens keen canvas shoes


womens hiking shoes boots


womens keen whisper shoes


womens keen clearwater cnx


sandal womens shoes





  






There's a new kid on the trail, KEEN, who made a lot of friends by offering quality outdoor shoes, hiking boots, sandals, and more. Men, women,... Keen



Keen Womens
 



 1-36 of 60 results
  1 2 Next
Sort by

Popularity
New
Brand A-Z
Brand Z-A
Price Low-High
Price High-Low
Avg. Customer Rating
Percent Off


Display 

12 per page
24 per page
36 per page
All

 



 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







New





Sale





Sale





Sale

































Keen Whisper Sandal (Women's)
  9 colors available 
 $62.95 - $89.95
 $90.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 






















Keen Rose Sandal (Women's)
  3 colors available 
 $89.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Sale

































Keen Newport H2 Sandal (Women's)
  7 colors available 
 $69.95 - $99.95
 $100.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 



























Keen UNEEK Sandal (Women's)
  4 colors available 
 $99.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 

















Keen Presidio (Women's)
  2 colors available 
 $109.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 






















Keen Voyageur Hiking Shoe (Women's)
  3 colors available 
 $114.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Sale





Sale





Sale





Sale





Keen Clearwater CNX (Women's)
  5 colors available 
 $69.95 - $75.95
 $100.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Sale





Sale





Sale





Sale








Sale





Keen UNEEK O2 Sandal (Women's)
  6 colors available 
 $62.95
 $90.00 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 

















Keen Oakridge Hiking Shoe (Women's)
  2 colors available 
 $94.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







New





New










New























New





Keen Terradora Mid Waterproof Hiking Boot (Women's)
  8 colors available 
 $139.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







New





Sale




























Keen Terradora Waterproof Hiking Shoe (Women's)
  6 colors available 
 $90.95 - $129.95
 $130.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







New




















Keen Kaci Full Grain Slip-On (Women's)
  4 colors available 
 $109.95 - $119.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 






















Keen Targhee II (Women's)
  3 colors available 
 $124.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Sale





Keen Uneek 8mm Rock Sandal (Women's)
  2 colors available 
 $69.95 - $75.95
 $100.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 

















Keen Targhee II Mid Boot (Women's)
  2 colors available 
 $134.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







New





New










Keen UNEEK Leather Sandal (Women's)
  3 colors available 
 $109.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







New





Sale















Keen Gypsum II Mid Waterproof Hiking Boot (Women's)
  4 colors available 
 $104.95 - $149.95
 $150.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 












Keen Gypsum II Waterproof Hiking Shoe (Women's)
  1 color available 
 $129.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 












Keen Presidio Sport Mesh Waterproof (Women's)
  1 color available 
 $119.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 












Keen Targhee II Mid Waterproof Hiking Boot (Women's)
  1 color available 
 $134.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Sale





Keen Mckenzie II Waterproof Shoe (Women's)
  2 colors available 
 $76.95
 $110.00 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Keen Newport EVO Closed Toe Fisherman Sandal (Women's)
  1 color available 
 $76.95
 $110.00 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Keen Durand Mid WP (Women's)
  1 color available 
 $125.95
 $180.00 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Sale





Sale





Keen Versatrail Waterproof Trail Shoe (Women's)
  3 colors available 
 $104.95
 $140.00 25% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale










Keen Voyageur Mid (Women's)
  2 colors available 
 $87.95 - $124.95
 $125.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Keen Venice (Women's)
  1 color available 
 $69.95
 $100.00 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale










Keen Aphlex Mid Waterproof Hiking Boot (Women's)
  2 colors available 
 $124.95 - $159.95
 $160.00 up to 22% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







New





Sale





Sale





Keen Morrison Mid Ankle Boot (Women's)
  3 colors available 
 $75.95 - $149.95
 $150.00 up to 49% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







New










Keen Terradora Hiking Shoe (Women's)
  2 colors available 
 $119.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 












Keen Oakridge Mid Waterproof Hiking Shoe (Women's)
  1 color available 
 $124.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Keen Lower East Side Lace Shoe (Women's)
  1 color available 
 $79.95
 $110.00 27% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Sale





Sale





Keen Versago Hiking Shoe (Women's)
  3 colors available 
 $83.95
 $120.00 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







New





Keen Presidio (Women's)
  1 color available 
 $109.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 












Keen Howser (Women's)
  1 color available 
 $69.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 

















Keen Victoria Crew Lite (2 Pairs) (Women's)
  2 colors available 
 $34.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Keen Helena (Women's)
  1 color available 
 $70.95
 $150.00 53% off 


   

Add to Cart 

  Next Page  




 


  
 Quick View is not available. Please try again. 
     
























Keen Mens - SHIPS FREE | Keen for Men











































































































Email
service@shoes.com








Call
1 (888) 200 - 8414

                                        Mon - Fri: 8:00 AM - Midnight ET
                                        
                                        Sat - Sun: 8:00 AM - 11:00 PM ET
                                    





























Error



Close
















Advanced Search





















Wish
List




0
Cart












														Your cart is currently unavailable
													








Checkout





















								Advanced search is currently unavailable
							

Close  ✕













































0



































Home > Mens Shoes > Keen Mens




You narrowed by


Keen


Men


Undo All Selections





Narrow by
Category


Boots (16)

Classics (24)

Closed Toe (24)

Comfort (41)

Active Sandals (7)

Athletic Shoes (22)

Casual Shoes (23)

Fisherman Sandals (10)

Sandals (16)

Trail Shoes (17)



Boots (16)

Classics (24)

Closed Toe (24)

Comfort (41)

Leather (36)

Open Toe (1)

Slippers (1)

Sneakers (5)

Snow Activities (17)

Steel Toe (1)

Walking (13)

Active Sandals (7)

Adjustable Strap Shoes (1)

Amphibious Sandals (3)

Amphibious Shoes (3)

Athletic (9)

Athletic Shoes (22)

Beach Sandals (1)

Beach Shoes (2)

BLVD Collection (2)

Bungee Lace Shoes (3)

Casual (15)

Casual Keen Collection (12)

Casual Shoes (23)

Fisherman Sandals (10)

Fitness Shoes (1)

Flat Sandals (1)

Gym Shoes (2)

High Tops (1)

Hiking Shoes (19)

Howser Collection (2)

Huaraches (3)

Lace Up Shoes (20)

Moc Toe Shoes (1)

Newport H2 (2)

Nubuck Shoes (4)

Rounded Toe Shoes (3)

Sandals (16)

Slides (1)

Slip Resistant Shoes (3)

Slip-on Shoes (1)

Targhee Collection (2)

Trail Shoes (17)

UNEEK Collection (7)

Voyageur (2)

Water Shoes (3)

Waterproof Shoes (13)

Woven Shoes (2)


 See Full List



Narrow by
Size


									7

									7.5

									8

									8.5

									9

									9.5

									10

									10.5

									11

									11.5

									12

									13

									14

									15

									16

									17




Narrow by
Width


Any Width

									Regular

									Wide




Narrow by
Color

































































Narrow by
Price


$35 - $65 (2)

$65 - $100 (26)

$100 - $150 (30)

$150 - $300 (5)

On Sale (24)





Narrow by
Feature


Beach (6)

Breathable (19)

Foot Odor (21)

Hiking (21)

Lace Up (23)

Outdoor (46)

Polyester (3)

Rubber Sole (37)

Synthetic (10)

Waterproof (24)



ASTM (1)

Adjustable Strap (3)

Arch Support (1)

Beach (6)

Braided (1)

Breathable (19)

Caged (1)

Closed Toe (1)

Compression (2)

Contrast Stitching (1)

Cushioned (13)

Exercise (2)

Fashion (1)

Fleece (3)

Fleece Lined (2)

Flexible (2)

Foot Odor (21)

Full Grain Leather (4)

Fur (1)

Handmade (1)

Hiking (21)

Hook and Loop (2)

Insulated (5)

Lace Up (23)

Latex (1)

Lightweight (15)

Lined (11)

Lug Sole (21)

Mesh (13)

Microfiber (1)

Mid Calf (1)

Non-Marking Sole (16)

Nubuck (9)

Nylon (8)

Outdoor (46)

Padded (1)

Polyester (3)

Quick Dry (3)

Removable Footbed (21)

Rubber (1)

Rubber Sole (37)

Safety Toe (1)

Slip-on (1)

Steel Toe (1)

Style Trek (2)

Suede (3)

Synthetic (10)

TPU (3)

Textile (1)

Travel (3)

Washable (2)

Water Resistant (3)

Waterproof (24)

Winter (3)

Woven (5)


 See Full List






Related Searches

mens keen black sandals


keen mens casual


mens keen targhee


sandals mens shoes


mens h2 sandal


keen womens voyageur hiking shoe





  






There's a new kid on the trail, KEEN, who made a lot of friends by offering quality outdoor shoes, hiking boots, sandals, and more. Men, women,... Keen



Keen Mens
 



 1-36 of 53 results
  1 2 Next
Sort by

Popularity
New
Brand A-Z
Brand Z-A
Price Low-High
Price High-Low
Avg. Customer Rating
Percent Off


Display 

12 per page
24 per page
36 per page
All

 



 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale











































Keen Newport H2 Sandal (Men's)
  8 colors available 
 $69.95 - $99.95
 $100.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 






















Keen Targhee II Mid Hiking Boot (Men's)
  3 colors available 
 $134.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 

















Keen Newport (Men's)
  2 colors available 
 $109.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Keen Arroyo II (Men's)
  1 color available 
 $69.95
 $100.00 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 



























Keen Targhee II (Men's)
  4 colors available 
 $124.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale

























Keen UNEEK Sandal (Men's)
  5 colors available 
 $69.95 - $99.95
 $100.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 












Keen Voyageur Hiking Shoe (Men's)
  1 color available 
 $114.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Sale










Keen Clearwater CNX (Men's)
  3 colors available 
 $69.95 - $99.95
 $100.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 

















Keen Rialto H2 Fisherman Sandal (Men's)
  2 colors available 
 $119.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale










Keen Uneek 8mm Cord Sandal (Men's)
  2 colors available 
 $69.95 - $99.95
 $100.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Keen Uneek Braided Slingback (Men's)
  1 color available 
 $69.95
 $100.00 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Sale










Keen UNEEK Slide Sandal (Men's)
  3 colors available 
 $62.95 - $89.95
 $90.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 

















Keen Rialto Fisherman Sandal (Men's)
  2 colors available 
 $129.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Sale





Keen UNEEK O2 Sandal (Men's)
  2 colors available 
 $62.95
 $90.00 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 

















Keen Rialto 3 Point Adjustable Strap Sandal (Men's)
  2 colors available 
 $119.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 

















Keen Oakridge Hiking Shoe (Men's)
  2 colors available 
 $94.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 

















Keen Oakridge Waterproof Hiking Shoe (Men's)
  2 colors available 
 $114.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Keen Saltzman Waterproof Hiking Shoe (Men's)
  1 color available 
 $99.95
 $130.00 23% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







New















Keen Austin Shoe (Men's)
  3 colors available 
 $109.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale










Keen Uneek Stripes Woven Sandal (Men's)
  2 colors available 
 $74.95 - $99.95
 $100.00 up to 25% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale















Keen Gypsum II Mid Waterproof Hiking Boot (Men's)
  3 colors available 
 $104.95 - $149.95
 $150.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 












Keen Voyageur Mid (Men's)
  1 color available 
 $124.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 












Keen Braddock Mid Steel Toe Boot (Men's)
  1 color available 
 $184.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







New





New










New





Keen UNEEK Leather Sandal (Men's)
  4 colors available 
 $109.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 












Keen Targhee II Waterproof Hiking Shoe (Men's)
  1 color available 
 $124.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 












Keen Durand Mid WP (Men's)
  1 color available 
 $179.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 












Keen Boston III Hiking Shoe (Men's)
  1 color available 
 $119.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Keen Daytona (Men's)
  1 color available 
 $76.95
 $110.00 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 






















Keen Oakridge Mid Waterproof Hiking Shoe (Men's)
  3 colors available 
 $124.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Sale





Sale





Keen Versago Hiking Shoe (Men's)
  3 colors available 
 $83.95
 $120.00 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 

















Keen Montford Hiking Shoe (Men's)
  2 colors available 
 $109.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







New





New










Keen Gypsum II Waterproof Hiking Shoe (Men's)
  3 colors available 
 $129.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale










Keen Rialto Traveler Hiking Shoe (Men's)
  2 colors available 
 $97.95 - $139.95
 $140.00 up to 30% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Keen Aphlex Mid Waterproof Hiking Boot (Men's)
  1 color available 
 $119.95
 $160.00 25% off 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 












Keen Durand Polar Shell Waterproof Snow Boot (Men's)
  1 color available 
 $179.95
 


   

Add to Cart 

 

 

Quick View


 New! Sale 







Sale





Sale





Sale





Keen Versatrail Waterproof Trail Shoe (Men's)
  3 colors available 
 $104.95
 $140.00 25% off 


   

Add to Cart 

  Next Page  




 


  
 Quick View is not available. Please try again. 
     























Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          




























Amazon Prime

































Interesting Finds Updated Daily










Amazon




    Try Prime
  


















All



All Departments
Alexa Skills
Amazon Devices
Amazon Video
Amazon Warehouse Deals
Appliances
Apps & Games
Arts, Crafts & Sewing
Automotive Parts & Accessories
Baby
Beauty & Personal Care
Books
CDs & Vinyl
Cell Phones & Accessories
Clothing, Shoes & Jewelry
   Women
   Men
   Girls
   Boys
   Baby
Collectibles & Fine Art
Computers
Courses
Credit and Payment Cards
Digital Music
Electronics
Gift Cards
Grocery & Gourmet Food
Handmade
Health, Household & Baby Care
Home & Business Services
Home & Kitchen
Industrial & Scientific
Kindle Store
Luggage & Travel Gear
Luxury Beauty
Magazine Subscriptions
Movies & TV
Musical Instruments
Office Products
Patio, Lawn & Garden
Pet Supplies
Prime Exclusive
Prime Pantry
Software
Sports & Outdoors
Tools & Home Improvement
Toys & Games
Vehicles
Video Games
Wine





Go

















Departments









EN

 
      




Hello. Sign inAccount & ListsSign inAccount & ListsOrdersTry PrimeCart0






Your Amazon.comToday's DealsGift Cards & RegistrySellHelpDisability Customer Support 





















































































There's a problem loading this menu right now.
Learn more about Amazon Prime.






 Get fast, free shipping with Amazon Prime 
 Prime members enjoy FREE Two-Day Shipping and exclusive access to music, movies, TV shows, original audio series, and Kindle books. 

      >
      Get started































 

Simplify your life with Amazon PrimeWhere savings happen and entertainment lives. 







Start your 30-day Prime free trial 

After your free trial, Amazon Prime is just $10.99/month.  Cancel anytime.
                    
                              See more plans  ›


Give the gift of Prime | 
                            Refer a friend | 
                            Have a Prime promo code?




    
    
    



Fast, FREE shipping on over 50 million eligible itemsChoose from FREE Two-Hour, Same-Day or Two-Day Delivery with Prime    
    
    



Need a last minute gift? Can’t get out of the house? Realize you forgot to pick up something? With FREE Two-Day Shipping and more from Amazon Prime, your shopping problems are solved. You get unlimited deliveries with no minimum order size, and with millions of eligible items, the options are practically limitless. When shipping to select metro areas, Prime members also get FREE Same-Day Delivery on over a million items and FREE 2-hour delivery with Prime Now on daily essentials and groceries. With FREE release-date delivery on eligible pre-order items, you can enjoy highly anticipated books, movies, and video games as soon as possible. 
Learn more about all the Prime shipping options

    
    
    



Enjoy instant access to video streaming    
    
    



Prime includes popular movies and TV shows    
    
    



Make every night a movie night with Prime Video. Your Prime membership includes instant access to thousands of movies and TV shows at no additional cost. Catch Amazon Original Series like Golden Globe-winning Transparent, Mozart in the Jungle, and Goliath, Emmy-winning Man in the High Castle, or exciting and wildly popular The Grand Tour. Stream on select Smart TVs, Roku, Xbox, Amazon Fire TV, iPhones, tablets, and Android devices. Download entertainment to your device to watch offline anywhere.
Browse movies and TV shows
    
    
    



Over two million songs. Thousands of playlists and stations.    
    
    



On-demand, ad-free music streaming     
    
    



Prime Music is a music streaming benefit featuring a growing selection of two million songs, Alexa voice-integration, and personalized recommendations at no additional cost with your Amazon Prime Membership. Unlock even more music with Amazon Music Unlimited, plus get an exclusive Prime member discount.
Learn more
    
    
    



Books, Magazines & More    
    
    



Unlimited reading on any device    
    
    



Prime Reading gives you unlimited access to over a thousand books, current issue magazines, books with Audible narration, comics, Kindle Singles, and more. With access from any device – including your phone, tablet, or Kindle – you can read however you want, whenever you want.
Learn more
    
    
    



Original audio series from Audible    
    
    



Unlimited listening to original audio series    
    
    



Get hooked on original audio series from Audible: hunt for clues with intrepid investigators, think big with bold visionaries, or ‘keep it real’ with fearless comedians. Listen to insightful and engaging playlists handcrafted for every interest and refreshed daily, drawing from news, comedy shows, articles, talks and more. Whether you want to turn rush hour into an adventure with a great story or master a new topic while riding the train, your commute will never be the same. Audible Channels–from Audible, a world leader in audio entertainment.
Learn More
    
    
    



Twitch Prime    
    
    



Get free game content every month, exclusive discounts, plus loads more    
    
    



Get a member exclusive discount on new release and preorder boxed video games. You'll get characters, vehicles, skins, and boosts for top games on Twitch, plus surprises like full indie games and exclusive loot. You also receive ad-free viewing and a free monthly Twitch channel subscription to support your favorite streamer.
Learn more
    
    
    



All your photos, together at last    
    
    



Free unlimited photo storage    
    
    



Your Prime membership comes with free unlimited photo storage through Prime Photos, which lets you securely save as many photos as you like and see them on your phone, computer, or tablet. You can share this Prime benefit and give free photo storage to up to five family members or friends. Collect photos together with your invited family and friends in the Family Vault and store memories from everyone in one safe place. New photo search technology makes it easy to find specific photos by searching for things like “sunset” or “Seattle,” and your photos are organized automatically so it’s easy to find and enjoy them.
Learn more
    
    
    



Prime Rewards    
    
    



Cardmembers earn 5% Back with a Prime Credit Card.    
    
    



Eligible Prime members can earn 5% back at Amazon.com using the Amazon Prime Rewards Visa Card or the Amazon Prime Store card. All Prime members earn 2% rewards on their debit spending with Amazon Prime Reload.
Learn More

    
    
    



Get Early Access    
    
    



30-minute early access to select Amazon Lightning Deals    
    
    



Consider yourself a techy, the best-styled fashionista on the block, or just an everyday savvy shopper? Be among the first to decide what's hot and what's not. Get 30-minute early access to select Lightning Deals on Amazon.

Shop Amazon Lightning Deals

Look for Prime eligible items, videos, music and Kindle books are clearly marked. Just look for the Prime logo when you shop. 














  Back to top      Get to Know Us   Careers   About Amazon   Investor Relations   Amazon Devices      Make Money with Us   Sell on Amazon   Sell Your Services on Amazon   Sell on Amazon Business   Sell Your Apps on Amazon   Become an Affiliate   Advertise Your Products   Self-Publish with Us   Become an Amazon Vendor   Sell Your Subscription on Amazon   › See all      Amazon Payment Products   Amazon Rewards Visa Signature Cards   Amazon.com Store Card   Amazon.com Corporate Credit Line   Shop with Points   Credit Card Marketplace   Reload Your Balance   Amazon Currency Converter      Let Us Help You   Your Account   Your Orders   Shipping Rates & Policies   Amazon Prime   Returns & Replacements   Manage Your Content and Devices   Amazon Assistant   Help                   English   United States          Amazon Music Stream millionsof songs       Amazon Drive Cloud storagefrom Amazon       6pm Score dealson fashion brands       AbeBooks Books, art& collectibles       ACX Audiobook PublishingMade Easy       Alexa Actionable Analyticsfor the Web       Amazon Business Everything ForYour Business          AmazonFresh Groceries & MoreRight To Your Door       AmazonGlobal Ship OrdersInternationally       Home Services Handpicked ProsHappiness Guarantee       Amazon Inspire Digital EducationalResources       Amazon Rapids Fun stories forkids on the go       Amazon Restaurants Food delivery fromlocal restaurants       Amazon Video Direct Video DistributionMade Easy          Amazon Web Services Scalable CloudComputing Services       Audible DownloadAudio Books       AudiobookStand Discount Audiobookson Disc       Book Depository Books With FreeDelivery Worldwide       Box Office Mojo Find MovieBox Office Data       ComiXology Thousands ofDigital Comics       CreateSpace Indie Print PublishingMade Easy          DPReview DigitalPhotography       East Dane Designer Men'sFashion       Fabric Sewing, Quilting& Knitting       Goodreads Book reviews& recommendations       IMDb Movies, TV& Celebrities       IMDbPro Get Info EntertainmentProfessionals Need       Junglee.com Shop Onlinein India          Kindle Direct Publishing Indie Digital PublishingMade Easy       Prime Now FREE 2-Hour Deliveryon Everyday Items       Prime Photos Unlimited Photo StorageFree With Prime       Shopbop DesignerFashion Brands       TenMarks.com Math Activitiesfor Kids & Schools       Warehouse Deals Open-BoxDiscounts       Whispercast Discover & DistributeDigital Content               Withoutabox Submit toFilm Festivals       Woot! Deals andShenanigans       Zappos Shoes &Clothing       Souq.com Shop Online inthe Middle East       Subscribe with Amazon Discover & trysubscription services               Conditions of Use   Privacy Notice   Interest-Based Ads   © 1996-2017, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates    










v































Free Psychic Readings by Psychics at Keen.com



































Sign In
Register



You deserve answers
Psychic readings provide clarity to any challenge or situation.

Get Started




Get 10 minutes for just $1.99





























